Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 52, article 2, section 3, subdivision 8, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 69, section 12, Laws 2024, chapter 123, article 1, section 11, Laws 2024, chapter 123, article 9, section 3, and Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 24, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Office of Justice Programs 94,758,000 80,434,000 Appropriations by Fund General 94,662,000 80,338,000 State Government Special Revenue 96,000 96,000 (a) Domestic and Sexual Violence Housing $1,500,000 each year is to establish a Domestic Violence Housing First grant program to provide resources for survivors of violence to access safe and stable housing and for staff to provide mobile advocacy and expertise in housing resources in their community and a Minnesota Domestic and Sexual Violence Transitional Housing program to develop and support medium to long term transitional housing for survivors of domestic and sexual violence with supportive services. The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 beginning in fiscal year 2026. (b) Federal Victims of Crime Funding Gap $11,000,000 each year is to fund services for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, child abuse, and other crimes. This is a onetime appropriation. (c) Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and Girls $1,248,000 each year is to establish and maintain the Minnesota Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and Girls. (d) Increased Staffing $667,000 the first year and $1,334,000 the second year are to increase staffing in the Office of Justice Programs for grant monitoring and compliance; provide training and technical assistance to grantees and potential grantees; conduct community outreach and engagement to improve the experiences and outcomes of applicants, grant recipients, and crime victims throughout Minnesota; expand the Minnesota Statistical Analysis Center; and increase staffing for the crime victim reimbursement program and the Crime Victim Justice Unit. (e) Office of Restorative Practices $500,000 each year is to establish and maintain the Office of Restorative Practices. (f) Crossover and Dual-Status Youth Model Grants $1,000,000 each year is to provide grants to local units of government to initiate or expand crossover youth practices model and dual-status youth programs that provide services for youth who are involved with or at risk of becoming involved with both the child welfare and juvenile justice systems, in accordance with the Robert F. Kennedy National Resource Center for Juvenile Justice model. This is a onetime appropriation.new text begin This appropriation is available until December 31, 2026.new text end (g) Restorative Practices Initiatives Grants $4,000,000 each year is for grants to establish and support restorative practices initiatives pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.95, subdivision 6, and for a restitution grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.955. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. The base for this appropriation is $2,500,000 beginning in fiscal year 2026. (h) Ramsey County Youth Treatment Homes Acquisition and Betterment $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to Ramsey County to establish, with input from community stakeholders, including impacted youth and families, up to seven intensive trauma-informed therapeutic treatment homes in Ramsey County that are licensed by the Department of Human Services, that are culturally specific, that are community-based, and that can be secured. These residential spaces must provide intensive treatment and intentional healing for youth as ordered by the court as part of the disposition of a case in juvenile court. This appropriation is available through June 30, 2027. (i) Ramsey County Violence Prevention $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to Ramsey County to award grants to develop new and further enhance existing community-based organizational support through violence prevention and community wellness grants. Grantees must use the money to create family support groups and resources to support families during the time a young person is placed out of home following a juvenile delinquency adjudication and support the family through the period of postplacement reentry; create community-based respite options for conflict or crisis de-escalation to prevent incarceration or further systems involvement for families; or establish additional meaningful employment opportunities for systems-involved youth. This appropriation is available through June 30, 2027. (j) Office for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives $274,000 each year is for increased staff and operating costs of the Office for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives, the Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives Advisory Board, and the Gaagige-Mikwendaagoziwag reward advisory group. (k) Youth Intervention Programs $3,525,000 the first year and $3,526,000 the second year are for youth intervention programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.73. The base for this appropriation is $3,526,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,525,000 in fiscal year 2027. (l) Community Crime Intervention and Prevention Grants $750,000 each year is for community crime intervention and prevention program grants, authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.296. This is a onetime appropriation. (m) Resources for Victims of Crime $1,000,000 each year is for general crime victim grants to meet the needs of victims of crime not covered by domestic violence, sexual assault, or child abuse services. This is a onetime appropriation. (n) Prosecutor Training $100,000 each year is for a grant to the Minnesota County Attorneys Association to be used for prosecutorial and law enforcement training, including trial school training and train-the-trainer courses. All training funded with grant proceeds must contain blocks of instruction on racial disparities in the criminal justice system, collateral consequences to criminal convictions, and trauma-informed responses to victims. This is a onetime appropriation. The Minnesota County Attorneys Association must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety policy and finance on the training provided with grant proceeds, including a description of each training and the number of prosecutors and law enforcement officers who received training. The report is due by February 15, 2025. The report may include trainings scheduled to be completed after the date of submission with an estimate of expected participants. (o) Minnesota Heals $500,000 each year is for the Minnesota Heals grant program. This is a onetime appropriation. (p) Sexual Assault Exam Costs $3,967,000 the first year and $3,767,000 the second year are to reimburse qualified health care providers for the expenses associated with medical examinations administered to victims of criminal sexual conduct as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 609.35, and for costs to administer the program. The base for this appropriation is $3,771,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,776,000 in fiscal year 2027. (q) First Responder Mental Health Curriculum $75,000 each year is for a grant to the Adler graduate school. The grantee must use the grant to develop a curriculum for a 24-week certificate to train licensed therapists to understand the nuances, culture, and stressors of the work environments of first responders to allow those therapists to provide effective treatment to first responders in distress. The grantee must collaborate with first responders who are familiar with the psychological, cultural, and professional issues of their field to develop the curriculum and promote it upon completion. The grantee may provide the program online. The grantee must seek to recruit additional participants from outside the 11-county metropolitan area. The grantee must create a resource directory to provide law enforcement agencies with names of counselors who complete the program and other resources to support law enforcement professionals with overall wellness. The grantee shall collaborate with the Department of Public Safety and law enforcement organizations to promote the directory. This is a onetime appropriation. (r) Pathways to Policing $400,000 each year is for reimbursement grants to state and local law enforcement agencies that operate pathway to policing programs. Applicants for reimbursement grants may receive up to 50 percent of the cost of compensating and training program participants. Reimbursement grants shall be proportionally allocated based on the number of grant applications approved by the commissioner. This is a onetime appropriation. (s) Direct Assistance to Crime Victim Survivors $5,000,000 each year is to provide grants for direct services and advocacy for victims of sexual assault, general crime, domestic violence, and child abuse. Funding must support the direct needs of organizations serving victims of crime by providing: direct client assistance to crime victims; competitive wages for direct service staff; hotel stays and other housing-related supports and services; culturally responsive programming; prevention programming, including domestic abuse transformation and restorative justice programming; and for other needs of organizations and crime victim survivors. Services funded must include services for victims of crime in underserved communities most impacted by violence and reflect the ethnic, racial, economic, cultural, and geographic diversity of the state. The office shall prioritize culturally specific programs, or organizations led and staffed by persons of color that primarily serve communities of color, when allocating funds. (t) Racially Diverse Youth $250,000 each year is for grants to organizations to address racial disparity of youth using shelter services in the Rochester and St. Cloud regional areas. Of this amount, $125,000 each year is to address this issue in the Rochester area and $125,000 each year is to address this issue in the St. Cloud area. A grant recipient shall establish and operate a pilot program connected to shelter services to engage in community intervention outreach, mobile case management, family reunification, aftercare, and follow up when family members are released from shelter services. A pilot program must specifically address the high number of racially diverse youth that enter shelters in the regions. This is a onetime appropriation. (u) Violence Prevention Project Research Center $500,000 each year is for a grant to the Violence Prevention Project Research Center, operating as a 501(c)(3) organization, for research focused on reducing violence in society that uses data and analysis to improve criminal justice-related policy and practice in Minnesota. Research must place an emphasis on issues related to deaths and injuries involving firearms. This is a onetime appropriation. Beginning January 15, 2025, the Violence Prevention Project Research Center must submit an annual report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety policy and finance on its work and findings. The report must include a description of the data reviewed, an analysis of that data, and recommendations to improve criminal justice-related policy and practice in Minnesota with specific recommendations to address deaths and injuries involving firearms. (v) Report on Approaches to Address Illicit Drug Use in Minnesota $118,000 each year is to enter into an agreement with Rise Research LLC for a study and set of reports on illicit drug use in Minnesota describing current responses to that use, reviewing alternative approaches utilized in other jurisdictions, and making policy and funding recommendations for a holistic and effective response to illicit drug use and the illicit drug trade. The agreement must establish a budget and schedule with clear deliverables. This appropriation is onetime. The study must include a review of current policies, practices, and funding; identification of alternative approaches utilized effectively in other jurisdictions; and policy and funding recommendations for a response to illicit drug use and the illicit drug trade that reduces and, where possible, prevents harm and expands individual and community health, safety, and autonomy. Recommendations must consider impacts on public safety, racial equity, accessibility of health and ancillary supportive social services, and the intersections between drug policy and mental health, housing and homelessness, overdose and infectious disease, child welfare, and employment. Rise Research may subcontract and coordinate with other organizations or individuals to conduct research, provide analysis, and prepare the reports required by this section. Rise Research shall submit reports to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety finance and policy, human services finance and policy, health finance and policy, and judiciary finance and policy. Rise Research shall submit an initial report by February 15, 2024, and a final report by March 1, 2025. (w) Legal Representation for Children $150,000 each year is for a grant to an organization that provides legal representation for children in need of protection or services and children in out-of-home placement. The grant is contingent upon a match in an equal amount from nonstate funds. The match may be in kind, including the value of volunteer attorney time, in cash, or a combination of the two. These appropriations are in addition to any other appropriations for the legal representation of children. This appropriation is onetime. (x) Pretrial Release Study and Report $250,000 each year are for a grant to the Minnesota Justice Research Center to study and report on pretrial release practices in Minnesota and other jurisdictions, including but not limited to the use of bail as a condition of pretrial release. This appropriation is onetime. (y) Intensive Comprehensive Peace Officer Education and Training Program $5,000,000 the first year is to implement the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program described in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.8516. This appropriation is available through June 30, 2027. (z) Youth Services Office $250,000 each year is to operate the Youth Services Office.